Maryland, session 2025, HB0436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
22–406.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a person may
not operate a vehicle registered under § 13–912, § 13–913, § 13–917, or § 13–937 of this
article on a highway in this State if:
(i) In the case of a vehicle registered under § 13–912 of this article,
there is affixed to any window of the vehicle any tinting materials added to the window
after manufacture of the vehicle that do not allow a light transmittance through the window
of at least 35%; and
(ii) In the case of a vehicle registered under § 13–913, § 13–917, or §
13–937 of this article, there is affixed to any window to the immediate right or left of the
driver any window tinting materials added after manufacture of the vehicle that do not
allow a light transmittance through the window of at least 35%.
(2) If a police officer observes that a vehicle is being operated in violation
of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the officer may stop the driver of the vehicle and, in
addition to a citation charging the driver with the offense, issue to the driver a safety
equipment repair order in accordance with the provisions of § 23–105 of this article.
– 1 –

Ch. 452 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A person may not install on a window of a vehicle any window tinting
material that does not comply with the light transmittance requirements specified in
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(4) (i) A person who must be protected from the sun for medical reasons
is exempt from the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection if the owner has, in the
vehicle at the time the vehicle is stopped by a police officer, a written certification in the
manner and format required by the Automotive Safety Enforcement Division of the
Department of State Police that details the owner’s medical need for tinted windows with
a light transmittance of less than the allowed 35%, from a physician licensed to practice
medicine in the State.
(ii) 1. A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A written certification under this paragraph shall be valid for a
period of time that the licensed physician determines the owner needs the enhanced tinted
windows[, not to exceed 2 years].
2. IF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN DETERMINES THAT THE
OWNER’S MEDICAL CONDITION IS PERMANENT, A WRITTEN CERTIFICATION UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE VALID INDEFINITELY.
(iii) This subsection does not apply to tinting materials that:
1. Are affixed in such a manner so as to be easily removed;
and
2. Are being used to protect a child less than 10 years of age
from the sun.
(iv) Nothing in this subsection may be construed to:
1. Allow any tinting materials to be added to the windshield
of a vehicle below the AS1 line or below 5 inches from the top of the windshield;
2. Prohibit a person from operating the vehicle while the
person for whom the written certification is required is not present in the vehicle, provided
that the written certification is in the vehicle; or
3. Alter or restrict the authority of the Administrator to
adopt regulations regarding vehicle windows, except with respect to the light transmittance
requirements specified in this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –